Missouri, session 2026, HB2306.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 137, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 137.109, to read as follows:
137.109. 1. This section shall be known and may be cited as the "Missouri
Disabled Veterans Homestead Exemption".
2. As used in this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "Commission", the state tax commission;
(2) "Disability rating", the percentage of disability assigned to a disabled
veteran by the United States Department of Veterans Affairs, reflecting the degree to
which the veteran's disability impacts his or her ability to work and perform daily
activities;
(3) "Disabled veteran", a Missouri resident who has served on active duty or
state active duty as a member of the Armed Forces of the United States, a member of the
Missouri National Guard, or a member of the United States Reserve Forces and who has
received an honorable discharge; has a service-connected disability and has received a
disability rating as certified by the United States Department of Veterans Affairs; and is
an owner of record and liable for the payment of property taxes on the qualified
residence for which the exemption allowed under this section is claimed;
(4) "Homestead", the real property located within the state of Missouri that is
actually owned and occupied by an individual as his or her primary residence and not to
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HCS HBs 2306, 2276 & 2089 2
exceed five acres of land surrounding it as is reasonably necessary for use of the
dwelling as a home;
(5) "Qualified residence", real property used as a homestead by a disabled
veteran or surviving spouse, but less any portion of such property that is used for
commercial purposes. If the property, or a portion of the property, is rented out to
another person for more than six months it is presumed to be used for commercial
purposes. No more than one property per claimant per tax year shall be claimed as a
qualified residence under this section.
3. In addition to all other exemptions authorized under Article X, Section 6 of
the Constitution of Missouri or otherwise authorized by law, and as authorized under
Article X, Section 6(a) of the Constitution of Missouri, for all tax years beginning on or
after January 1, 2027, an annual exemption is granted from the fair market value for
the purposes of calculating the assessed value and tax liability of a disabled veteran's
qualified residence, limited to the amounts set forth as follows:
(1) For disabled veterans with a disability rating of fifty percent or more but less
than seventy percent, the annual exemption up to the first one hundred fifty thousand
dollars of fair market value;
(2) For disabled veterans with a disability rating of seventy percent or more but
less than one hundred percent, the annual exemption up to the first two hundred fifty
thousand dollars of fair market value; and
(3) For disabled veterans with a disability rating of one hundred percent, the
annual exemption up to the first five hundred thousand dollars of fair market value.
4. The exemption under this section carries over to the benefit of the disabled
veteran's surviving spouse as long as the spouse holds the legal or beneficial title to the
qualified residence and permanently resides therein. The exemption for a surviving
spouse shall remain proportional to the disabled veteran's disability rating as of the time
of the veteran's passing.
5. If an exemption is granted under this section and the person awarded the
exemption subsequently becomes a resident of a facility licensed under chapter 198, a
Missouri veterans' home as defined under section 42.002, or a facility operated by the
United States Department of Veterans Affairs, the exemption shall continue:
(1) If the residence continues to be occupied by the disabled veteran's spouse; or
(2) If the residence remains unoccupied but is still owned by the disabled veteran
who qualifies for the exemption.
6. The exemption and determination of eligibility under this section applies for
tax years beginning on or after January 1, 2027. The claim for an exemption shall not
be transferred or assigned, except as provided for under this section.

HCS HBs 2306, 2276 & 2089 3
7. In order to verify eligibility for the exemption allowed under this section, no
later than April first of each tax year for which an exemption is claimed, a disabled
veteran or surviving spouse shall:
(1) Submit an application on a form provided by the county or city not within a
county to the local assessor's or collector's office or other entity as directed by local rule
or ordinance;
(2) Include documentation that verifies proof of the disability rating, including
official documentation from the United States Department of Veterans Affairs;
(3) Include proof of ownership and occupation of the qualified residence; and
(4) Any additional forms, documents, or other items required by the local
authority for verification of eligibility for a disabled veteran or, if applicable, additional
items to verify an individual's eligibility and status as a surviving spouse.
8. The collector's office, assessor's office, or other entity designated by rule or
ordinance shall review applications and determine eligibility of the residential property
based on the criteria set forth under this section and by the application, visual
inspection, questionnaire, or other reasonable methods. The determination shall be
made in accordance with guidelines established by the commission and any additional
local rules or regulations.
9. The governing body of the county or city not within a county may adopt
reasonable procedures and promulgate ordinances, rules, and regulations in order to
implement and administer the provisions of this section and comply with any additional
requirements or regulations promulgated by the commission.
10. The exemption granted under this section shall not affect the process of
setting the tax rate as required under Article X, Section 22 of the Constitution of
Missouri and section 137.073 in any prior, current, or subsequent tax year.
11. The commission may promulgate all necessary rules and regulations for the
administration of this section. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that term is defined in
section 536.010, that is created under the authority delegated in this section shall
become effective only if it complies with and is subject to all of the provisions of chapter
536 and, if applicable, section 536.028. This section and chapter 536 are nonseverable
and if any of the powers vested with the general assembly pursuant to chapter 536 to
review, to delay the effective date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently
held unconstitutional, then the grant of rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or
adopted after August 28, 2026, shall be invalid and void.
12. No rule promulgated by the commission shall in any way adversely impact,
interrupt, or interfere with the performance of the required statutory duties of any
county elected official including, but not limited to, the county collector, when

HCS HBs 2306, 2276 & 2089 4
performing such duties as deemed necessary for the purposes of this section and the
distribution of all other real and personal property taxes.
13. This section shall not be subject to the provisions of the Missouri sunset act
under sections 23.250 to 23.298.
✔